California statutes. Revenue and Taxation Code
(a) Notwithstanding Sections 706.071, 706.073, 706.080, 706.101, and 706.105 of the Code of Civil Procedure, the California Department of Tax and Fee Administration may serve earnings withholding orders for taxes and any other notice or document required to be served or provided in connection with an earnings withholding order for taxes according to Article 4 (commencing with Section 706.070) of Chapter 5 of Division 2 of Title 9 of Part 2 of the Code of Civil Procedure to government and private employers by electronic transmission or other electronic technology.

(b) Upon consent of the employer, the California Department of Tax and Fee Administration may provide
 service by electronic transmission or other electronic technology under this section.

(c) Notwithstanding Sections 706.071, 706.073, 706.080, 706.101, 706.125, and 706.126 of the Code of Civil Procedure, the California Department of Tax and Fee Administration may receive the employer’s return, as described in Section 706.126 of the Code of Civil Procedure, by electronic transmission or other electronic technology.

(d) This section shall apply in the same manner and with the same force and effect and to the full extent as if this section had been incorporated in full into Article 4 (commencing with Section 706.070) of Chapter 5 of Division 2 of Title 9 of Part 2 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(e) This section shall
 apply to notices served or provided on or after the effective date of the act adding this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 511, Sec. 16.   (SB 889)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 7. Overpayments and Refunds [38601. - 38631.]



  ARTICLE 1. Claim for Refund [38601. - 38607.]

38601.

If the department determines that any amount, penalty, or interest has been paid more than once or has been erroneously or illegally collected or computed, the department shall set forth that fact in the records of the department, certify the amount collected in excess of the amount legally due and the person from whom it was collected or by whom paid, and credit the excess amount collected or paid on any amounts then due and payable from the person from whom the excess amount was collected or by whom it was paid under this part, and the balance shall be refunded to the person, or the person’s successors, administrators, or executors. Any determination by the department pursuant to this section with respect to an amount in excess of fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) shall be available as a public record for at
 least 10 days after the effective date of that determination.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 474, Sec. 48.   (SB 1496)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

38602.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b) no refund shall be approved by the board after three years from the last day of the month following the close of the quarterly period for which the overpayment was made, or, with respect to determinations made under Article 2, 3 or 4 of Chapter 5 of this part, after six months from the date the determinations become final, or after six months from the date of overpayment, whichever period expires the later, unless a claim therefor is filed with the board within such period. No credit shall be approved by the board after the expiration of such period unless a claim for credit is filed with the board within
 such period, or unless the credit relates to a period for which a waiver is given pursuant to Section 38419.

(b) A refund may be approved by the board for any period for which a waiver is given under Section 38419 if a claim therefor is filed with the board before the expiration of the period agreed upon.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 176.)
-------------------------------------------

38602.5.

(a) The limitation period specified in Section 38602 shall be suspended during any period of a person’s life that the person is financially disabled.

(b) (1) For purposes of subdivision (a), a person is financially disabled if the person is unable to manage his or her financial affairs by reason of medically determinable physical or mental impairment of the person which can be expected to result in death or which has lasted or can be expected to last
 for a continuous period of not less than 12 months. A person shall not be considered to have an impairment unless proof of the existence thereof is furnished in the form and manner as the board may require.

(2) A person shall not be treated as financially disabled during any period that the person’s spouse or any other person is authorized to act on behalf of the person in financial matters.

(c) This section applies to periods of disability commencing before, on, or after the effective date of the act adding this section, but does not apply to any claim for refund that (without regard to this section) is barred by the operation or rule of law, including res judicata, as of the effective date of the act adding this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1052, Sec. 39.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

38603.

Every claim shall be in writing and shall state the specific grounds upon which the claim is founded.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 176.)
-------------------------------------------

38604.

Failure to file a claim within the time prescribed in this article constitutes a waiver of any demand against the state on account of overpayment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 176.)
-------------------------------------------

38605.

Within 30 days after disallowing any claim in whole or in part the board shall serve notice of its action on the claimant in the manner prescribed for service of notice of a deficiency determination.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 176.)
-------------------------------------------

38606.

Interest shall be paid upon any overpayment of any amount of tax at the modified adjusted rate per month, or fraction thereof, as defined in Section 6591.5, from the last day of the calendar month following the quarterly period for which the overpayment was made; but no refund or credit shall be made of any interest imposed upon the person making the overpayment with respect to the amount being refunded or credited.

The interest shall be paid as follows:

(a) In the case of a refund, to the last day of the calendar month following the date upon which the person making the overpayment, if the person has not already filed a
 claim, is notified by the department that a claim may be filed or the date upon which the claim is approved by the department, whichever date is the earlier.

(b) In the case of a credit, to the same date as that to which interest is computed on the tax or amount against which the credit is applied.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 432, Sec. 38.   (SB 824)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

38607.

(a) If the board determines that any overpayment has been made intentionally or by reason of carelessness, it shall not allow any interest thereon.

(b) If any person who has filed a claim for refund requests the board to defer action on the claim, the board, as a condition to deferring action, may require the claimant to waive interest for the period during which the person requests the board to defer action on the claim.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 176.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Suit for Refund [38611. - 38617.]

38611.

No injunction or writ of mandate or other legal or equitable process shall issue in any suit, action, or proceeding in any court against this state or against any officer of the state to prevent or enjoin the collection under this part of any tax or any amount of tax required to be collected.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 176.)
-------------------------------------------

38612.

No suit or proceeding shall be maintained in any court for the recovery of any amount alleged to have been erroneously or illegally determined or collected unless a claim for refund or credit has been duly filed pursuant to Article 1 (commencing with Section 38601).

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 498, Sec. 34.)
-------------------------------------------

38613.

Within 90 days after the mailing of the notice of the board’s action upon a claim filed pursuant to Article 1 (commencing with Section 38601), the claimant may bring an action against the board on the grounds set forth in the claim in a court of competent jurisdiction in any city or city and county of this state in which the Attorney General has an office for the recovery of the whole or any part of the amount with respect to which the claim has been disallowed.

Failure to bring action within the time specified constitutes a waiver of any demand against the state on account of alleged
 overpayments.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 498, Sec. 35.)
-------------------------------------------

38614.

If the board fails to mail notice of action on a claim within six months after the claim is filed, the claimant may, prior to the mailing of notice by the board of its action on the claim, consider the claim disallowed and bring an action against the board on the grounds set forth in the claim for the recovery of the whole or any part of the amount claimed as an overpayment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 176.)
-------------------------------------------

38615.

If judgment is rendered for the plaintiff, the amount of the judgment shall first be credited on any timber yield tax or timber reserve fund tax due and payable from the plaintiff. The balance of the judgment shall be refunded to the plaintiff.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 176.)
-------------------------------------------

38616.

In any judgment, interest shall be allowed at the modified adjusted rate per month, or fraction thereof, as defined in Section 6591.5, upon the amount found to have been illegally collected from the date of payment of the amount to the date of allowance of credit on account of the judgment or to a date preceding the date of the refund warrant by not more than 30 days, the date to be determined by the
 California Department of Tax and Fee Administration.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 432, Sec. 39.   (SB 824)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

38617.

A judgment shall not be rendered in favor of the plaintiff in any action brought against the board to recover any amount paid when the action is brought by or in the name of an assignee of the person paying the amount or by any person other than the person who paid the amount.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 176.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Recovery of Erroneous Refunds [38621. - 38624.]

38621.

(a) The Controller may recover any refund or part thereof that is erroneously made and any credit or part thereof that is erroneously allowed in an action brought in a court of competent jurisdiction in the County of Sacramento in the name of the people of the State of California.

(b) As an alternative to subdivision (a), the board may recover any refund or part thereof that is erroneously made and any credit or part thereof that is erroneously allowed pursuant to this
 part. In recovering any erroneous refunds or credits, the board, in its discretion, may issue a deficiency determination in accordance with Article 2 (commencing with Section 38411) or Article 4 (commencing with Section 38431) of Chapter 5. Except in the case of fraud, the determination shall be made within three years from the date of the Controller’s warrant or date of credit.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 929, Sec. 32.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

38622.

The action shall be tried in the County of Sacramento unless the court with the consent of the Attorney General orders a change of place of trial.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 176.)
-------------------------------------------

38623.

The Attorney General shall prosecute the action, and the provisions of the Code of Civil Procedure relating to service of summons, pleadings, proofs, trials, and appeals are applicable to the proceedings.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 176.)
-------------------------------------------

38624.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of this part, if the department finds that neither the person liable for payment of tax nor any party related to that person has in any way caused an erroneous refund for which an action for recovery is provided under Section 38621, no interest shall be imposed on the amount of that erroneous refund until 30 days after the date on which the department serves a notice of determination for repayment of the erroneous refund to the person. The act of filing a claim for refund shall not be considered as causing the erroneous refund.

(b) This section shall be operative for any action for recovery under Section 38621 on or after January 1, 2000.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 499, Sec. 63.   (SB 1528)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Cancellations [38631. - 38631.]

38631.

If any amount has been illegally determined either by the person filing the return or by the department, the department shall set forth that fact in its records, certify the amount determined to be in excess of the amount legally due and the person against whom the determination was made, and authorize the cancellation of the amount upon the records of the department. Any determination by the department pursuant to this section with respect to an amount in excess of fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) shall be available as a public record for at least 10 days after the effective date of that determination.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 474, Sec. 49.   (SB 1496)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 8. Administration [38701. - 38800.]

38701.

The board shall enforce the provisions of this part and may prescribe, adopt, and enforce rules and regulations relating to the application, administration and enforcement of this part. The board may prescribe the extent to which any ruling or regulation shall be applied without retroactive effect.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 176.)
-------------------------------------------

38702.

The board may employ accountants, auditors, appraisers, investigators, assistants, and clerks necessary for the efficient administration of this part and may designate representatives to conduct hearings, prescribe regulations, or perform any other duties imposed by this part or other laws of this state upon the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 176.)
-------------------------------------------

38703.

Every timber owner shall keep such records, receipts, invoices, and other pertinent papers in such form as the board may require by rules or regulations.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 176.)
-------------------------------------------

38704.

The board or any person authorized in writing by it may examine the books, papers, records, and timber of any timber owner or timber operator as defined in Section 4526.5 of the Public Resources Code and may investigate the character of the business of the person in order to verify the accuracy of any return made, or, if no return is made by the person, to ascertain and determine the amount required to be paid.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 176.)
-------------------------------------------

38705.

Except as provided in Sections 38402 and 38706, it is unlawful for the board or any person having an administrative duty under this part to make known in any manner whatever the business affairs, operations, or any other information pertaining to any timber owner or any other person required to report to the board or pay a tax pursuant to this part, or the amount or source of income, profits, losses, expenditures, or any particular thereof, set forth or disclosed in any return, or to permit any return or copy thereof or any book containing any abstract or particulars thereof to be seen or examined by any person. However, the Governor may, by general or special order,
 authorize examination by other state officers, by tax officers of another state, by the federal government, if a reciprocal arrangement exists, or by any other person of the records maintained by the board under this part. The information so obtained pursuant to the order of the Governor shall not be made public except to the extent and in the manner that the order may authorize that it be made public.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 387.)
-------------------------------------------

38706.

Upon written request of the assessor of any county containing timber, the board shall permit the assessor, or any duly authorized deputy or employee of such assessor, to examine any records pertaining to the county of such assessor which are maintained by the board under this part. It is unlawful for the assessor or any other person examining records pursuant to this section to make known in any manner whatever the business affairs, operations or any other information pertaining to any timber owner or any other person required to report to the board or pay a tax pursuant to this part, or the amount or source of income, profits, loans, expenditures, or any particular
 thereof, set forth or disclosed in any return, except that any appraisal data, including “market data” as defined in Section 408, may be disclosed to any other assessor. Any assessor who unlawfully discloses information of any timber owner or any other person required to report to the board or pay a tax pursuant to this part shall forfeit one thousand dollars ($1,000) to the county, to be recovered on his official bond in an action brought in the name of the people by the Attorney General, when directed to do so by the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 387.)
-------------------------------------------

38707.

(a) Except as otherwise provided by law, any person who is engaged in the business of preparing, or providing services in connection with the preparation of, returns under Chapter 5 of this part, or any person who for compensation prepares any such return for any other person, and who knowingly or recklessly does either of the following, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor, and, upon conviction thereof, shall be fined not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000) or imprisoned no more than one year, or both, together with the costs of
 prosecution:

(1) Discloses any information furnished to him or her for, or in connection with, the preparation of the return.

(2) Uses that information for any purpose other than to prepare, or assist in preparing, the return.

(b) Subdivision (a) shall not apply to disclosure of information if that disclosure is made pursuant to the person’s consent or pursuant to a subpoena, court order, or other compulsory legal process.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1052, Sec. 39.3.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

38708.

(a) Every taxpayer is entitled to be reimbursed for any reasonable fees and expenses related to a hearing before the board if all of the following conditions are met:

(1) The taxpayer files a claim for the fee and expenses with the board within one year of the date the decision of the board becomes final.

(2) The board, in its sole discretion, finds that the action taken by the board staff was unreasonable.

(3) The board decides that the taxpayer be awarded a specific amount of fees and expenses related to the hearing, in an amount determined by the board in its sole discretion.

(b) To determine whether the board staff has been unreasonable, the board shall consider whether the board staff has established that its position was substantially justified.

(c) The amount of reimbursed fees and expenses shall be limited to the following:

(1) Fees and expenses incurred after the date of the notice of determination, jeopardy determination, or denial of a claim for refund.

(2) If the board finds that the staff was unreasonable with respect to certain issues but reasonable with respect to other issues,
 the amount of reimbursed fees and expenses shall be limited to those which relate to the issues where the staff was unreasonable.

(d) Any proposed award by the board pursuant to this section shall be available as a public record for at least 10 days prior to the effective date of the award.

(e) This section shall be operative for claims filed on or after January 1, 2001.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1052, Sec. 39.5.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

38800.

(a) (1) Beginning on January 1, 2007, the executive director and chief counsel of the board, or their delegates, may compromise any final tax liability where the reduction of tax is seven thousand five hundred dollars ($7,500) or less.

(2) Except as provided in paragraph (3), the board,
 upon recommendation by its executive director and chief counsel, jointly, may compromise a final tax liability involving a reduction in tax in excess of seven thousand five hundred dollars ($7,500). Any recommendation for approval of an offer in compromise that is not either approved or disapproved within 45 days of the submission of the recommendation shall be deemed approved.

(3) The board, itself, may by resolution delegate to the executive director and the chief counsel, jointly, the authority to compromise a final tax liability in which the reduction of tax is in excess of seven thousand five hundred dollars ($7,500), but less than ten thousand dollars ($10,000).

(b) For purposes of this section, “a final tax liability” means any final tax liability arising under Part 18.5 (commencing with Section 38101), or related interest, additions to tax, penalties, or other amounts
 assessed under this part.

(c) Offers in compromise shall be considered only for liabilities that were generated from persons who no longer harvest timber, or property owners that no longer harvest their property, except where the taxpayer making the offer has their primary residence located on the property that generated the timber tax liability.

(d) Offers in compromise shall not be considered where the taxpayer has been convicted of felony tax evasion under this part during the liability period.

(e) For amounts to be compromised under this section, the following conditions shall exist:

(1) The taxpayer shall establish that:

(A) The amount offered in payment is the most that can be
 expected to be paid or collected from the taxpayer’s present assets or income.

(B) The taxpayer does not have reasonable prospects of acquiring increased income or assets that would enable the taxpayer to satisfy a greater amount of the liability than the amount offered, within a reasonable period of time.

(2) The board shall have determined that acceptance of the compromise is in the best interest of the state.

(f) A determination by the board that it would not be in the best interest of the state to accept an offer in compromise in satisfaction of a final tax liability shall not be subject to administrative appeal or judicial review.

(g) (1) Offers for liabilities with a fraud or evasion penalty shall require a minimum offer of
 the unpaid tax and fraud or evasion penalty.

(2) The minimum offer may be waived if it can be shown that the taxpayer making the offer was not the person responsible for perpetrating the fraud or evasion. This authorization to waive only applies to partnership accounts where the intent to commit fraud or evasion can be clearly attributed to a partner of the taxpayer.

(h) When an offer in compromise is either accepted or rejected, or the terms and conditions of a compromise agreement are fulfilled, the board shall notify the taxpayer in writing. In the event an offer is rejected, the amount posted will either be applied to the liability or refunded, at the discretion of the taxpayer.

(i) When more than one taxpayer is liable for the debt, such as with spouses or partnerships or other business combinations, including,
 but not limited to, taxpayers who are liable through dual determination or successor’s liability, the acceptance of an offer in compromise from one liable taxpayer shall reduce the amount of the liability of the other taxpayers by the amount of the accepted offer.

(j) Whenever a compromise of tax or penalties or total tax and penalties in excess of five hundred dollars ($500) is approved, there shall be placed on file for at least one year in the office of the executive director of the board a public record with respect to that compromise. The public record shall include all of the following information:

(1) The name of the taxpayer.

(2) The amount of unpaid tax and related penalties, additions to tax, interest, or other amounts involved.

(3) The amount
 offered.

(4) A summary of the reason why the compromise is in the best interest of the state.

The public record shall not include any information that relates to any trade secrets, patent, process, style of work, apparatus, business secret, or organizational structure, that if disclosed, would adversely affect the taxpayer or violate the confidentiality provisions of Section 38705. No list shall be prepared and no releases distributed by the board in connection with these statements.

(k) Any compromise made under this section may be rescinded, all compromised liabilities may be reestablished, without regard to any statute of limitations that otherwise may be applicable, and no portion of the amount offered in compromise refunded, if either of the following occurs:

(1) The
 board determines that any person did any of the following acts regarding the making of the offer:

(A) Concealed from the board any property belonging to the estate of any taxpayer or other person liable for the tax.

(B) Received, withheld, destroyed, mutilated, or falsified any book, document, or record or made any false statement, relating to the estate or financial condition of the taxpayer or other person liable for the tax.

(2) The taxpayer fails to comply with any of the terms and conditions relative to the offer.

(l) Any person who, in connection with any offer or compromise under this section, or offer of that compromise to enter into that agreement, willfully does either of the following shall be guilty of a felony and, upon conviction, shall be
 fined not more than fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) or imprisoned pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170 of the Penal Code, or both, together with the costs of investigation and prosecution:

(1) Conceals from any officer or employee of this state any property belonging to the estate of a taxpayer or other person liable in respect of the tax.

(2) Receives, withholds, destroys, mutilates, or falsifies any book, document, or record, or makes any false statement, relating to the estate or financial condition of the taxpayer or other person liable in respect of the tax.

(m) For purposes of this section, “person” means the taxpayer, any member of the taxpayer’s family, any corporation, agent, fiduciary, or representative of, or any other individual or entity acting on behalf of, the taxpayer, or any other corporation
 or entity owned or controlled by the taxpayer, directly or indirectly, or that owns or controls the taxpayer, directly or indirectly.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 15, Sec. 579.   (AB 109)   Effective April 4, 2011.   Operative October 1, 2011, by Sec. 636 of Ch. 15, as amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 39, Sec. 68.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 9. Violations and Res Judicata [38801. - 38805.]

38801.

Any timber owner or other person who fails or refuses to furnish any return required to be made, or who fails or refuses to furnish a supplemental return or other data required by the board, is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable as provided in Section 38803.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 498, Sec. 37.)
-------------------------------------------

38802.

Any person required to make, render, sign, or verify any report who makes any false or fraudulent return, with intent to defeat or evade the determination required by law to be made of an amount due is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable as provided in Section 38803.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 498, Sec. 39.)
-------------------------------------------

38803.

Any violation of this part by any person is a misdemeanor. Each offense shall be punished by a fine of not less than one thousand dollars ($1,000) and not more than five thousand dollars ($5,000), or imprisonment not exceeding one year in the county jail, or both the fine and imprisonment.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 498, Sec. 41.)
-------------------------------------------

38804.

Any prosecution for violation of any of the penal provisions of this part shall be instituted within three years after the commission of the offense.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 176.)
-------------------------------------------

38805.

In the determination of any case arising under this part the rule of res judicata is applicable only if the liability involved is for the same quarterly period as was involved in another case previously determined.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 176.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 10. Disposition of Proceeds [38901. - 38908.]

38901.

All taxes, interest and penalties imposed and all amounts of tax required to be paid under this part shall be made in remittances to the State Board of Equalization and shall be deposited in the State Treasury as provided in this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 176.)
-------------------------------------------

38903.

(a) All taxes, interest, penalties and other amounts paid or collected pursuant to this part on or before July 31, 1983, except taxes paid or collected pursuant to Section 38301, shall be deposited in the Timber Tax Fund, which is hereby created.

(b) On and after August 1, 1983, all taxes, interest, penalties, and other amounts paid or collected pursuant to this part shall be deposited in the Timber Tax Fund.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1281, Sec. 47.   Effective September 30, 1983.)
-------------------------------------------

38904.

The money in the Timber Tax Fund is appropriated as follows:

(a) To reimburse the General Fund for funds advanced for costs incurred by the board in administration of this part as follows:

(1) Four hundred sixty-seven thousand nine hundred thirty dollars ($467,930) for fiscal years 1975–76 and 1976–77.

(2) Amounts identified and approved in subsequent fiscal years as
 approved in the Budget Bill. One-half of this amount shall be reimbursed to the General Fund between November 1 and November 10, and the remaining one-half between May 1 and May 10. In the event that not all funds approved in the Budget Bill are actually expended by the board, then in the succeeding fiscal year, the amount to be reimbursed to the General Fund between November 1 and November 10 shall be reduced by an amount equal to the unexpended appropriation of the preceding fiscal year.

(b) To reimburse the General Fund for funds advanced for costs incurred by the State Forester in administration of Section 4582.8 of the Public Resources Code as follows:

(1) Thirteen thousand five hundred dollars ($13,500) for fiscal years 1975–76 and 1976–77.

(2) Amounts identified and approved in subsequent fiscal years as
 approved in the Budget Bill.

(c) To the Controller to allocate pursuant to Sections 38905 and 38905.1.

(d) To pay refunds authorized by this part of taxes imposed pursuant to Section 38115 and interest, penalties, and other amounts paid or collected pursuant to this part and deposited in the Timber Tax Fund.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 940, Sec. 15.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

38905.1.

(a) Commencing with the 1983–84 fiscal year, the Controller shall, pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 38904, on November 30 and May 31 of each fiscal year, transmit to county treasurers the balance that existed in the Timber Tax Fund on the preceding November 10 or May 10, respectively, in accordance with the following allocation schedule:

(1) For the 1983–84 fiscal year, 50 percent of the balance in Timber Tax Fund shall be transmitted to county treasurers based on the
 annual yield tax revenue guarantee certified for each county pursuant to subdivision (c) or (e) of Section 27423 of the Government Code. The remaining 50 percent of the balance in the fund shall be transmitted to county treasurers in the same proportion that the balance to be transmitted was generated from each county, as certified by the State Board of Equalization.

(2) For the 1984–85 fiscal year and each fiscal year thereafter, 100 percent of the balance in the fund shall be transmitted to county treasurers in the same proportion that the balance to be transmitted was generated from each county, as certified by the State Board of Equalization.

(b) Upon receipt of funds pursuant to subdivision (a), the county auditor shall within 10 days distribute the funds among the jurisdictions (as defined in Section 95) within the county in the same proportion that each jurisdiction’s
 minimum revenue guarantee, determined pursuant to Section 27423 of the Government Code, bears to the total of all those amounts for all jurisdictions within the county.

(c) It is the intent of the Legislature that the provisions of subdivision (a) shall provide a final and conclusive disposition of the problem of allocating yield tax revenues among counties entitled to those revenues.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 248, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

38908.

Local governmental entities which are allocated funds pursuant to Section 38905 or 38905.1 may expend such funds without restriction.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1058, Sec. 9.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 19. ENERGY RESOURCES SURCHARGE LAW [40001. - 40216.]



  CHAPTER 1. General Provisions and Definitions [40001. - 40010.]

40001.

This part is known and may be cited as the “Energy Resources Surcharge Law.”

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 991.)
-------------------------------------------

40002.

Except where the context otherwise requires, the definitions given in this chapter govern the construction of this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 991.)
-------------------------------------------

40003.

“Surcharge” means a tax levied by this state.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 991.)
-------------------------------------------

40004.

“Person” includes any individual, firm, cooperative organization, fraternal organization, corporation, limited liability company, estate, trust, business trust, receiver, trustee, syndicate, this state, any county, city and county, municipality, district, public agency or subdivision of this state or any other group or combination acting as a unit.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1200, Sec. 72.   Effective September 30, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

40005.

“Board” or “department” means the California Department of Tax and Fee Administration.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 499, Sec. 64.   (SB 1528)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

40006.

“In this state” means within the exterior limits of the State of Caliornia and includes all territory within those limits owned by or ceded to the United States of America.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 991.)
-------------------------------------------

40007.

“Sale” or “purchase” mean the furnishing or receiving of electrical energy for a consideration. “Sale” does not include the charging of batteries when the consideration therefor is not computed upon the kilowatt-hours of electrical energy furnished.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 991.)
-------------------------------------------

40008.

“Consumption” means the utilization or employment of electrical energy. The term does not include the receiving of electrical energy by an electric utility for resale.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 991.)
-------------------------------------------

40009.

“Consumer” means any person receiving for consumption electrical energy furnished by an electric utility and includes a person receiving electrical energy for redistribution for the use of his tenants.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 991.)
-------------------------------------------

40010.

“Electric utility” means any person engaged in producing, generating, transmitting, furnishing, distributing or delivering electrical energy for sale without regard to whether the person is subject to regulation or is regulated by the Public Utilities Commission. The term does not include a person who generates electrical energy or redistributes electrical energy solely for his own use or for the use of his tenants and not for sale to others.

When the board determines that it is necessary for the efficient administration of this part, the board may regard any person not primarily engaged in the business of selling electrical energy
 who purchases electrical energy for distribution to others as a consumer and not as an electric utility.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 991.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. The Surcharge [40016. - 40036.]



  ARTICLE 1. Imposition of Surcharge [40016. - 40025.]

40016.

(a) A surcharge is imposed on the consumption in this state of electrical energy purchased from an electric utility on and after January 1, 2003, at the rate of three-tenths mill ($0.0003) per kilowatt-hour, or at the rate determined pursuant to subdivision (b).

(b) The Energy Commission shall fix the rate at a public meeting in each November for each calendar year starting the following January. Under no circumstances may the rate fixed exceed three-tenths mill ($0.0003)
 per kilowatt-hour. If the commission fails to fix the rate in any November, the surcharge shall continue at the rate in effect during that November.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 1124, Sec. 55.   Effective September 30, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

40018.

Every person consuming electrical energy in this state purchased from an electric utility, or the United States or an agency thereof, is liable for the surcharge. His liability is not extinguished until the surcharge has been paid to this state, except that payment to an electric utility registered under this part is sufficient to relieve the consumer from further liability for the surcharge.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 624.)
-------------------------------------------

40019.

Every electric utility making sales of electrical energy to consumers in this state shall collect the surcharge from each consumer, other than a consumer that is an electric utility, at the time it collects its billings from the consumer for the electrical energy sold; provided, the duty to collect the surcharge from a consumer shall commence with the beginning of the first regular billing period applicable to that person which starts on or after the operative date of this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 991.)
-------------------------------------------

40019.1.
